Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6068HH (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2187 Section 1. Section 297.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 297.9 Use for other than school purposes. 3 1. The board of directors of any school district may 4 authorize the use of any schoolhouse and its grounds within 5 such district for the purpose of meetings of granges, 6 lodges, agricultural societies, and similar societies, for 7 parent-teacher associations, for community recreational 8 activities, community education programs, election purposes, 9 other meetings of public interest, public forums and similar 10 community purposes; provided that such use shall in no way 11 interfere with school activities; such use to be for such 12 compensation and upon such terms and conditions as may be fixed 13 by said board for the proper protection of the schoolhouse 14 and the property belonging therein, including that of pupils, 15 except that in the case of community education programs, any 16 compensation necessary for programs provided specifically by 17 community education and not those provided through community 18 education by other agencies or organizations shall be 19 compensated from the funding provided for community education 20 programs. 21 2. a. The board of directors of each school district 22 shall allow a youth-oriented community organization reasonable 23 access to any schoolhouse and its grounds within such district 24 to distribute and provide instructional materials in order 25 to encourage participation in the youth-oriented community 26 organization. 27 b. The board of directors of each school district shall 28 establish terms and conditions governing the reasonable 29 access provided to a youth-oriented community organization 30 under paragraph âaâ to provide for the proper protection of 31 students enrolled in the school district, employees of the 32 school district, the schoolhouse, and the property within the 33 schoolhouse. The terms and conditions governing the reasonable 34 access must satisfy all of the following requirements: 35 -1- LSB 6068HH (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 2187 (1) Prohibit a youth-oriented community organization from 1 interfering with classroom instructional time. 2 (2) When it can be reasonably accommodated, allow a 3 youth-oriented community organization to have access to 4 after-school events, including back-to-school events. 5 c. For purposes of this subsection, âyouth-oriented 6 community organizationâ means any patriotic and national 7 organization described in 36 U.S.C. Â§20101 â 240112, as of July 8 1, 2018. 9